fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-minwasin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - minwâsin - help : # Wolvengrey VIIn
   
     minwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Sg:  minwâsin
     minwâsin+V+II+Ind+3Pl:  minwâsinwa
     minwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Sg:  minwâsininiw
     minwâsin+V+II+Ind+4Pl:  minwâsininiwa
     
     PV/ê+minwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Sg:  ê-minwâsik
     PV/ê+minwâsin+V+II+Cnj+3Pl:  ê-minwâsiki
     PV/ê+minwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Sg:  ê-minwâsininik
     PV/ê+minwâsin+V+II+Cnj+4Pl:  ê-minwâsininiki
     
     minwâsin+V+II+Cond+3Sg:  minwâsiki
     minwâsin+V+II+Cond+3Pl:  minwâsikwâwi
     minwâsin+V+II+Cond+4Sg:  minwâsininiki
     minwâsin+V+II+Cond+4Pl:  minwâsininikwâwi
